Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.020

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall be defined as follows:

(1) "Agency" means an office of an alien bank that is exercising the powers authorized by RCW 30A.42.180.

(2) "Alien bank" means a bank organized under the laws of a foreign country and having its principal place of business in that country, the majority of the beneficial ownership and control of which is vested in citizens of countries other than the United States of America.

(3) "Branch" means an office of an alien bank that is exercising the powers authorized by RCW 30A.42.105, 30A.42.115, and 30A.42.155.

(4) "Bureau" means an alien bank's operation in this state exercising the powers authorized by RCW 30A.42.230.

(5) "Office" means a branch or agency of an alien bank carrying on business in this state pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2014 c 37 s 211; 1994 c 92 s 80; 1983 c 3 s 48; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.42.020.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).